Maryland, session 2025, HB0049.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
2–1602.
(c) (1) On or before June 1, 2023, the Department shall adopt regulations to
implement this section.
(2) Regulations adopted under this section shall:
(i) Subject to items (ii) and (iii), (III), (IV), AND (V) of this
paragraph, include energy use intensity targets by building type;
(ii) As necessary, include special provisions or exceptions to account
for:
1. Building age;
2. Regional differences;
3. The unique needs of particular building or occupancy
types, including health care facilities, laboratories, assisted living and nursing facilities,
military buildings, critical infrastructure, and buildings used in life sciences as defined in
§ 3–201 of the Economic Development Article; and
4. The use of district energy systems and biofuels by covered
buildings;
5. CREDITING THE GENERATION OF ON–SITE
RENEWABLE ENERGY BY COVERED BUILDINGS TOWARD THEIR ENERGY USE
INTENSITY TARGETS;
6. CREDITING THE GREENHOUSE GAS REDUCTION
IMPACT OF THE ON–SITE USE OF BIOMETHANE;

HOUSE BILL 49
7. EXCLUDING THE ENERGY USE AND GREENHOUSE GAS
EMISSIONS RELATED TO THE PRODUCTION OF STEAM FOR STERILIZATION IN A
HEALTH CARE FACILITY, LABORATORY, ASSISTED LIVING AND NURSING FACILITY,
MILITARY BUILDING, OR BUILDING USED IN LIFE SCIENCES;
8. EXCLUDING THE ENERGY USE AND GREENHOUSE GAS
EMISSIONS RELATED TO THE GENERATION OF EMERGENCY BACKUP POWER AT A
HEALTH CARE FACILITY, LABORATORY, ASSISTED LIVING AND NURSING FACILITY,
MILITARY BUILDING, CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE, OR BUILDING USED IN LIFE
SCIENCES; AND
9. OPERATIONAL NEEDS, INCLUDING SCALING FACTORS
TO ADJUST FOR DIFFERENT OPERATING HOURS;
(iii) Consider the needs of the owners of covered buildings who:
1. Are not responsible for the design, modification, fixtures,
or equipment of commercial tenants;
2. Do not have access to or control over building energy
systems that are used or controlled by commercial tenants; or
3. Own buildings occupied by commercial tenants who are
responsible for all maintenance of and repairs to the buildings;
(iv) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, EXEMPT
FROM ENERGY USE INTENSITY TARGETS A COVERED BUILDING THAT CONTAINS AN
AREA DESIGNED, BUILT, AND OPERATED AS A PERMANENT SENSITIVE
COMPARTMENTED INFORMATION FACILITY AND IS OPERATED BY AN AGENCY OR
CONTRACTOR OF:
1. THE U.S. GENERAL SERVICES ADMINISTRATION;
2. A. THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF DEFENSE;
B. THE NATIONAL SECURITY AGENCY;
C. THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY;
OR
D. ANY OTHER U.S. INTELLIGENCE AGENCY; OR
3. THE STATE;

HOUSE BILL 49 5
(V) EXEMPT AN OWNER OF A COVERED BUILDING FROM
ENERGY USE INTENSITY REPORTING REQUIREMENTS IF:
1. THE COVERED BUILDING MEETS THE CRITERIA
UNDER ITEM (IV) OF THIS PARAGRAPH; AND
2. THE TENANT OR OCCUPANT DOES NOT PROVIDE
ENERGY USE INFORMATION TO THE OWNER OF THE COVERED BUILDING DUE TO
CONCERNS ABOUT THE CONFIDENTIALITY OF THE BUILDING’S SECURE AREA;
(VI) Provide maximum flexibility to the owners of covered buildings
to comply with building energy performance standards;
(v) (VII) Subject to paragraph (3) (4) of this subsection AND
SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, include an alternative compliance pathway allowing
the owner of a covered building to pay a fee for [greenhouse]:
1. GREENHOUSE gas emissions attributable to the
building’s failure to meet direct greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets; and
2. ENERGY USE ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE BUILDING’S
FAILURE TO MEET ENERGY USE INTENSITY TARGETS;
(VIII) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (4)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND
SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, INCLUDE AN ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE
PATHWAY ALLOWING THE OWNER OF A COVERED BUILDING TO PAY A FEE OF 5
CENTS PER THOUSAND BRITISH THERMAL UNITS OF ENERGY, ADJUSTED FOR
INFLATION USING 2020 AS THE BASELINE YEAR FOR CALCULATING THE
ADJUSTMENT, FOR ENERGY USE ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE BUILDING’S FAILURE TO
MEET ENERGY USE INTENSITY TARGETS;
(IX) ALLOW THE OWNER OF A COVERED BUILDING TO REQUEST
A ONE–TIME WAIVER, FOR THE ENTIRE BUILDING, FROM PAYING AN ALTERNATIVE
COMPLIANCE PATHWAY FEE UNDER ITEMS (VII) AND (VIII) OF THIS PARAGRAPH
THROUGH NOT LATER THAN 2039 FOR ENERGY OR EMISSIONS ATTRIBUTABLE TO
CONTINUED OPERATION OF EQUIPMENT INSTALLED BEFORE 2025 FOR THE
EXPECTED AVERAGE REMAINING LIFESPAN OF THAT EQUIPMENT, AS IDENTIFIED BY
A PUBLICLY AVAILABLE DATABASE SELECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT, BY:
1. SUBMITTING TO THE DEPARTMENT, AT LEAST 1 YEAR
BEFORE THE REQUESTED WAIVER WOULD TAKE EFFECT:

HOUSE BILL 49
A. AN INVENTORY OF DESCRIPTIONS, SERIAL NUMBERS,
AND INSTALLATION DATES OF THE EQUIPMENT THAT PROVIDES THE BASIS OF THE
WAIVER APPLICATIONS; AND
B. A PLAN PREPARED BY AN ENERGY AUDITOR THAT
COMPLETED THE TRAINING REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (7) OF THIS SUBSECTION
DETAILING THE DATES THAT SPECIFIC PROJECTS WILL BE COMPLETED AND THE
ENERGY USE INTENSITY AND GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS SAVINGS THAT WILL
RESULT FROM THE PROJECTS;
2. DEMONSTRATING IN THE PLAN PREPARED UNDER
ITEM 1B OF THIS ITEM HOW THE BUILDING WILL COME INTO COMPLIANCE WITH THE
FINAL TARGETS BEFORE 2040 WITH MINIMAL RELIANCE ON ALTERNATIVE
COMPLIANCE PATHWAY PAYMENTS;
3. CERTIFYING THAT THE PROJECTS WILL BE
COMPLETED BY THE DATES DETAILED UNDER ITEM 1B OF THIS ITEM, OR THAT THE
EXEMPTED ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE PATHWAY FEES WILL BE PAID IF THE
PROJECTS ARE NOT COMPLETED BY THOSE DATES; AND
4. PAYING A FEE TO COVER THE COST FOR THE
DEPARTMENT OR ITS CONTRACTOR TO REVIEW THE PLAN;
(X) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ALLOW
THE OWNER OF A COVERED BUILDING TO REQUEST A WAIVER FROM PAYING
ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE PATHWAY FEES FOR ENERGY USE OR GREENHOUSE GAS
EMISSIONS ASSOCIATED WITH ENERGY OR EMISSIONS REDUCTION MEASURES THAT
THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES TO BE IMPRACTICABLE OR ECONOMICALLY
INFEASIBLE BY:
1. SUBMITTING TO THE DEPARTMENT, AT LEAST 1 YEAR
BEFORE THE REQUESTED WAIVER WOULD TAKE EFFECT, AN ENGINEERING STUDY
PREPARED BY AN ENERGY AUDITOR THAT COMPLETED THE TRAINING REQUIRED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (7) OF THIS SUBSECTION DETAILING THE PRACTICABILITY OR
IMPRACTICABILITY OR ECONOMIC FEASIBILITY OR INFEASIBILITY OF ENERGY OR
EMISSIONS REDUCTION MEASURES THAT WOULD BE NEEDED TO ACHIEVE THE
ENERGY USE INTENSITY AND DIRECT GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS REDUCTION
TARGETS;
2. DETAILING THE ENERGY USE INTENSITY OR DIRECT
GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS ABOVE TARGET LEVELS THAT WOULD OCCUR IF THE
OWNER OF THE COVERED BUILDING DOES NOT IMPLEMENT THE IMPRACTICABLE OR
ECONOMICALLY INFEASIBLE MEASURES; AND

HOUSE BILL 49 7
3. PAYING A FEE TO COVER THE COST FOR THE
DEPARTMENT OR ITS CONTRACTOR TO REVIEW THE STUDY;
(VI) (XI) To the extent authorized by law, include financial
incentives recommended by the Building Energy Transition Implementation Task Force;
AND
(VII) (XII) INCLUDE AN ANNUAL REPORTING FEE OF $100 PER
COVERED BUILDING, ADJUSTED FOR INFLATION, TO COVER THE ADMINISTRATIVE
COSTS UNDER THIS SECTION OF THE PROGRAM.
(3) (I) AN OWNER OF A COVERED BUILDING THAT IS EXEMPT FROM
ENERGY USE INTENSITY TARGETS UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(IV) OF THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL PROVIDE AN AFFIDAVIT SIGNED BY AN OFFICER OR PRINCIPAL
CONTROLLING MEMBER, SHAREHOLDER, OR PARTNER OF THE OWNER OF THE
COVERED BUILDING THAT PROVIDES:
1. THE ADDRESS OF EACH BUILDING FOR WHICH THE
EXEMPTION APPLIES; AND
2. A STATEMENT CONFIRMING THAT AS OF THE DATE OF
THE AFFIDAVIT THE BUILDING MEETS THE STANDARDS SET FORTH IN PARAGRAPH
(2)(IV) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) INFORMATION SUBMITTED TO THE DEPARTMENT UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2)(IV) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND THIS PARAGRAPH IS EXEMPT FROM
DISCLOSURE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 4–301(A)(2) OF THE GENERAL PROVISIONS
ARTICLE.
(4) (I) The Department may not set an alternative compliance fee that
is less than the social cost of greenhouse gases adopted by the Department or the U.S.
Environmental Protection Agency THAT IS IN THE AMOUNT OF $190 PER METRIC TON
OF EXCESS CARBON DIOXIDE EQUIVALENT, ADJUSTED FOR INFLATION USING 2020
AS THE BASELINE YEAR FOR CALCULATING THE ADJUSTMENT.
(II) IF A COVERED BUILDING EXERCISES THE ALTERNATIVE
COMPLIANCE FEE OPTION FOR BOTH DIRECT GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS
TARGETS AND ENERGY USE INTENSITY TARGETS, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
COLLECT ONLY THE HIGHER OF THE TWO FEES.
(5) (I) A WAIVER GRANTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(X) OF THIS
SUBSECTION:

HOUSE BILL 49
1. SHALL REMAIN IN EFFECT FOR A PERIOD OF 5 YEARS;
AND
2. MAY BE RENEWED.
(II) IN MAKING A DETERMINATION ON A WAIVER REQUEST
SUBMITTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(X) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL:
1. IF A COVERED BUILDING EXERCISES THE
ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE FEE OPTION FOR BOTH DIRECT GREENHOUSE GAS
EMISSIONS TARGETS AND ENERGY USE INTENSITY TARGETS, CONSIDER ONLY THE
HIGHER OF THE TWO FEES WHEN CALCULATING AVOIDED COMPLIANCE PATHWAY
PAYMENTS; AND
2. CONSIDER THE AVAILABILITY OF CAPITAL.
(4) (6) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEPOSIT AN ALTERNATIVE
COMPLIANCE FEE COLLECTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION INTO THE MARYLAND
STRATEGIC ENERGY INVESTMENT FUND UNDER § 9–20B–05 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(7) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
1. OFFER TRAINING TO HELP ENERGY AUDITORS THAT
POSSESS, IN GOOD STANDING, A PROFESSIONAL LICENSE OR CREDENTIAL
RECOGNIZED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDERSTAND THE REGULATIONS ADOPTED
UNDER THIS SECTION, INCLUDING REQUIREMENTS FOR ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE
PLANS AND ENGINEERING STUDIES;
2. PUBLISH A LIST OF ENERGY AUDITORS THAT HAVE
COMPLETED THE TRAINING OFFERED UNDER ITEM 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH; AND
3. INCLUDE A FEE TO COVER THE COST FOR THE
DEPARTMENT OR ITS CONTRACTOR TO PROVIDE THE TRAINING.
(II) AN OWNER OF A COVERED BUILDING SHALL CONTRACT
WITH AN ENERGY AUDITOR THAT COMPLETED THE TRAINING REQUIRED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH TO SUBMIT AN ENGINEERING PLAN OR
STUDY SEEKING A WAIVER UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(IX) AND (X) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(8) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY CERTIFY A BUILDING ENERGY PERFORMANCE STANDARDS

HOUSE BILL 49 9
PROGRAM ADOPTED BY A COUNTY AND WAIVE THE REQUIREMENT FOR A COVERED
BUILDING TO COMPLY WITH THE STATEWIDE PROGRAM ADOPTED UNDER THIS
SECTION WHEN:
1. THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES, BASED ON A
DEMONSTRATION PROVIDED BY THE COUNTY, THAT THE COUNTY HAS ADOPTED A
BUILDING ENERGY PERFORMANCE STANDARDS PROGRAM THAT IS AT LEAST AS
STRINGENT AS THE STATEWIDE PROGRAM ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
2. THE COUNTY ANNUALLY SUBMITS TO THE
DEPARTMENT A COMPLETE LIST OF COVERED BUILDINGS, INCLUDING THEIR
ENERGY USE INTENSITY, DIRECT GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS, AND COMPLIANCE
STATUS WITH THE COUNTY PROGRAM.
(II) A COUNTY ADMINISTERING A BUILDING ENERGY
PERFORMANCE STANDARDS PROGRAM CERTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY TAKE APPROPRIATE ACTIONS TO
ENFORCE THE STANDARDS, INCLUDING:
1. ESTABLISHING ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE
PATHWAYS FOR COMPLYING WITH ENERGY USE INTENSITY AND DIRECT
GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED IN THE STANDARDS;
2. IMPOSING AND COLLECTING ALTERNATIVE
COMPLIANCE FEES IN THE SAME AMOUNT AND MANNER ALLOWED BY THE
DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
3. IMPOSING AND COLLECTING PENALTIES IN THE SAME
AMOUNT AND MANNER ALLOWED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER § 2–610 OF THIS
TITLE.
(9) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL PRECLUDE A COUNTY FROM
ADOPTING BUILDING ENERGY PERFORMANCE STANDARDS FOR BUILDINGS THAT
ARE NOT COVERED BUILDINGS UNDER THE STATEWIDE PROGRAM ADOPTED UNDER
THIS SECTION.
(10) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE THE NECESSARY APPLICATION
AND FORMS FOR A WAIVER UNDER THIS SECTION AVAILABLE ON THE
DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE.
(F) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY NOT:

HOUSE BILL 49
(I) IMPOSE AND COLLECT ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE FEES
UNDER THIS SECTION UNTIL 2032; OR
(II) IMPOSE AND COLLECT PENALTIES FOR FAILURE TO
ACHIEVE BUILDING ENERGY PERFORMANCE STANDARDS UNDER THIS SECTION
UNTIL 2032.
(2) THE PROHIBITION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS
SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO THE IMPOSITION AND COLLECTION OF PENALTIES
FOR FAILURE TO MEET ANY REPORTING REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Environment
2–1602.
(c) (1) On or before June 1, 2023, the Department shall adopt regulations to
implement this section.
(2) Regulations adopted under this section shall:
(i) Subject to items (ii) AND (III), (III), (IV), AND (V) of this
paragraph, include energy use intensity targets by building type;
(ii) As necessary, include special provisions or exceptions to account
for:
1. Building age;
2. Regional differences;
3. The unique needs of particular building or occupancy
types, including health care facilities, laboratories, assisted living and nursing facilities,
military buildings, critical infrastructure, and buildings used in life sciences as defined in
§ 3–201 of the Economic Development Article; and
4. The use of district energy systems and biofuels by covered
buildings;
5. CREDITING THE GENERATION OF ON–SITE
RENEWABLE ENERGY BY COVERED BUILDINGS TOWARD THEIR ENERGY USE
INTENSITY TARGETS;

HOUSE BILL 49 11
6. CREDITING THE GREENHOUSE GAS REDUCTION
IMPACT OF THE ON–SITE USE OF BIOMETHANE;
7. EXCLUDING THE ENERGY USE AND GREENHOUSE GAS
EMISSIONS RELATED TO THE PRODUCTION OF STEAM FOR STERILIZATION IN A
HEALTH CARE FACILITY, LABORATORY, ASSISTED LIVING AND NURSING FACILITY,
MILITARY BUILDING, OR BUILDING USED IN LIFE SCIENCES;
8. EXCLUDING THE ENERGY USE AND GREENHOUSE GAS
EMISSIONS RELATED TO THE GENERATION OF EMERGENCY BACKUP POWER AT A
HEALTH CARE FACILITY, LABORATORY, ASSISTED LIVING AND NURSING FACILITY,
MILITARY BUILDING, CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE, OR BUILDING USED IN LIFE
SCIENCES; AND
9. OPERATIONAL NEEDS, INCLUDING SCALING FACTORS
TO ADJUST FOR DIFFERENT OPERATING HOURS;
(iii) Consider the needs of the owners of covered buildings who:
1. Are not responsible for the design, modification, fixtures,
or equipment of commercial tenants;
2. Do not have access to or control over building energy
systems that are used or controlled by commercial tenants; or
3. Own buildings occupied by commercial tenants who are
responsible for all maintenance of and repairs to the buildings;
(iv) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, EXEMPT
FROM ENERGY USE INTENSITY TARGETS A COVERED BUILDING THAT CONTAINS AN
AREA DESIGNED, BUILT, AND OPERATED AS A PERMANENT SENSITIVE
COMPARTMENTED INFORMATION FACILITY AND IS OPERATED BY AN AGENCY OR
CONTRACTOR OF:
1. THE U.S. GENERAL SERVICES ADMINISTRATION;
2. A. THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF DEFENSE;
B. THE NATIONAL SECURITY AGENCY;
C. THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY;
OR
D. ANY OTHER U.S. INTELLIGENCE AGENCY; OR

HOUSE BILL 49
3. THE STATE;
(V) EXEMPT AN OWNER OF A COVERED BUILDING FROM
ENERGY USE INTENSITY REPORTING REQUIREMENTS IF:
1. THE COVERED BUILDING MEETS THE CRITERIA
UNDER ITEM (IV) OF THIS PARAGRAPH; AND
2. THE TENANT OR OCCUPANT DOES NOT PROVIDE
ENERGY USE INFORMATION TO THE OWNER OF THE COVERED BUILDING DUE TO
CONCERNS ABOUT THE CONFIDENTIALITY OF THE BUILDING’S SECURE AREA;
(VI) Provide maximum flexibility to the owners of covered buildings
to comply with building energy performance standards;
(v) (VII) Subject to paragraph (3) (4) of this subsection AND
SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, include an alternative compliance pathway allowing
the owner of a covered building to pay a fee for [greenhouse]:
1. GREENHOUSE gas emissions attributable to the
building’s failure to meet direct greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets; and
2. ENERGY USE ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE BUILDING’S
FAILURE TO MEET ENERGY USE INTENSITY TARGETS;
(VIII) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (4)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND
SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, INCLUDE AN ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE
PATHWAY ALLOWING THE OWNER OF A COVERED BUILDING TO PAY A FEE OF 5
CENTS PER THOUSAND BRITISH THERMAL UNITS OF ENERGY, ADJUSTED FOR
INFLATION USING 2020 AS THE BASELINE YEAR FOR CALCULATING THE
ADJUSTMENT, FOR ENERGY USE ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE BUILDING’S FAILURE TO
MEET ENERGY USE INTENSITY TARGETS;
(IX) ALLOW THE OWNER OF A COVERED BUILDING TO REQUEST
A ONE–TIME WAIVER, FOR THE ENTIRE BUILDING, FROM PAYING AN ALTERNATIVE
COMPLIANCE PATHWAY FEE UNDER ITEMS (VII) AND (VIII) OF THIS PARAGRAPH
THROUGH NOT LATER THAN 2039 FOR ENERGY OR EMISSIONS ATTRIBUTABLE TO
CONTINUED OPERATION OF EQUIPMENT INSTALLED BEFORE 2025 FOR THE
EXPECTED AVERAGE REMAINING LIFESPAN OF THAT EQUIPMENT, AS IDENTIFIED BY
A PUBLICLY AVAILABLE DATABASE SELECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT, BY:
1. SUBMITTING TO THE DEPARTMENT, AT LEAST 1 YEAR
BEFORE THE REQUESTED WAIVER WOULD TAKE EFFECT:

HOUSE BILL 49 13
A. AN INVENTORY OF DESCRIPTIONS, SERIAL NUMBERS,
AND INSTALLATION DATES OF THE EQUIPMENT THAT PROVIDES THE BASIS OF THE
WAIVER APPLICATIONS; AND
B. A PLAN PREPARED BY AN ENERGY AUDITOR THAT
COMPLETED THE TRAINING REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (7) OF THIS SUBSECTION
DETAILING THE DATES THAT SPECIFIC PROJECTS WILL BE COMPLETED AND THE
ENERGY USE INTENSITY AND GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS SAVINGS THAT WILL
RESULT FROM THE PROJECTS;
2. DEMONSTRATING IN THE PLAN PREPARED UNDER
ITEM 1B OF THIS ITEM HOW THE BUILDING WILL COME INTO COMPLIANCE WITH THE
FINAL TARGETS BEFORE 2040 WITH MINIMAL RELIANCE ON ALTERNATIVE
COMPLIANCE PATHWAY PAYMENTS;
3. CERTIFYING THAT THE PROJECTS WILL BE
COMPLETED BY THE DATES DETAILED UNDER ITEM 1B OF THIS ITEM, OR THAT THE
EXEMPTED ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE PATHWAY FEES WILL BE PAID IF THE
PROJECTS ARE NOT COMPLETED BY THOSE DATES; AND
4. PAYING A FEE TO COVER THE COST FOR THE
DEPARTMENT OR ITS CONTRACTOR TO REVIEW THE PLAN;
(X) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ALLOW
THE OWNER OF A COVERED BUILDING TO REQUEST A WAIVER FROM PAYING
ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE PATHWAY FEES FOR ENERGY USE OR GREENHOUSE GAS
EMISSIONS ASSOCIATED WITH ENERGY OR EMISSIONS REDUCTION MEASURES THAT
THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES TO BE IMPRACTICABLE OR ECONOMICALLY
INFEASIBLE BY:
1. SUBMITTING TO THE DEPARTMENT, AT LEAST 1 YEAR
BEFORE THE REQUESTED WAIVER WOULD TAKE EFFECT, AN ENGINEERING STUDY
PREPARED BY AN ENERGY AUDITOR THAT COMPLETED THE TRAINING REQUIRED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (7) OF THIS SUBSECTION DETAILING THE PRACTICABILITY OR
IMPRACTICABILITY OR ECONOMIC FEASIBILITY OR INFEASIBILITY OF ENERGY OR
EMISSIONS REDUCTION MEASURES THAT WOULD BE NEEDED TO ACHIEVE THE
ENERGY USE INTENSITY AND DIRECT GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS REDUCTION
TARGETS;
2. DETAILING THE ENERGY USE INTENSITY OR DIRECT
GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS ABOVE TARGET LEVELS THAT WOULD OCCUR IF THE

HOUSE BILL 49
OWNER OF THE COVERED BUILDING DOES NOT IMPLEMENT THE IMPRACTICABLE OR
ECONOMICALLY INFEASIBLE MEASURES; AND
3. PAYING A FEE TO COVER THE COST FOR THE
DEPARTMENT OR ITS CONTRACTOR TO REVIEW THE STUDY;
(vi) (XI) To the extent authorized by law, include financial
incentives recommended by the Building Energy Transition Implementation Task Force;
AND
(VII) (XII) INCLUDE AN ANNUAL REPORTING FEE OF $100 PER
COVERED BUILDING, ADJUSTED FOR INFLATION, TO COVER THE ADMINISTRATIVE
COSTS UNDER THIS SECTION OF THE PROGRAM.
(3) (I) AN OWNER OF A COVERED BUILDING THAT IS EXEMPT FROM
ENERGY USE INTENSITY TARGETS UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(IV) OF THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL PROVIDE AN AFFIDAVIT SIGNED BY AN OFFICER OR PRINCIPAL
CONTROLLING MEMBER, SHAREHOLDER, OR PARTNER OF THE OWNER OF THE
COVERED BUILDING THAT PROVIDES:
1. THE ADDRESS OF EACH BUILDING FOR WHICH THE
EXEMPTION APPLIES; AND
2. A STATEMENT CONFIRMING THAT AS OF THE DATE OF
THE AFFIDAVIT THE BUILDING MEETS THE STANDARDS SET FORTH IN PARAGRAPH
(2)(IV) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) INFORMATION SUBMITTED TO THE DEPARTMENT UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2)(IV) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND THIS PARAGRAPH IS EXEMPT FROM
DISCLOSURE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 4–301(A)(2) OF THE GENERAL PROVISIONS
ARTICLE.
(4) (I) The Department may not set an alternative compliance fee that
is less than the social cost of greenhouse gases adopted by the Department or the U.S.
Environmental Protection Agency THAT IS IN THE AMOUNT OF $190 PER METRIC TON
OF EXCESS CARBON DIOXIDE EQUIVALENT, ADJUSTED FOR INFLATION USING 2020
AS THE BASELINE YEAR FOR CALCULATING THE ADJUSTMENT.
(II) IF A COVERED BUILDING EXERCISES THE ALTERNATIVE
COMPLIANCE FEE OPTION FOR BOTH DIRECT GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS
TARGETS AND ENERGY USE INTENSITY TARGETS, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
COLLECT ONLY THE HIGHER OF THE TWO FEES.

HOUSE BILL 49 15
(5) (I) A WAIVER GRANTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(X) OF THIS
SUBSECTION:
1. SHALL REMAIN IN EFFECT FOR A PERIOD OF 5 YEARS;
AND
2. MAY BE RENEWED.
(II) IN MAKING A DETERMINATION ON A WAIVER REQUEST
SUBMITTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(X) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL:
1. IF A COVERED BUILDING EXERCISES THE
ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE FEE OPTION FOR BOTH DIRECT GREENHOUSE GAS
EMISSIONS TARGETS AND ENERGY USE INTENSITY TARGETS, CONSIDER ONLY THE
HIGHER OF THE TWO FEES WHEN CALCULATING AVOIDED COMPLIANCE PATHWAY
PAYMENTS; AND
2. CONSIDER THE AVAILABILITY OF CAPITAL.
(4) (6) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEPOSIT AN ALTERNATIVE
COMPLIANCE FEE COLLECTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION INTO THE MARYLAND
STRATEGIC ENERGY INVESTMENT FUND UNDER § 9–20B–05 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(7) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
1. OFFER TRAINING TO HELP ENERGY AUDITORS THAT
POSSESS, IN GOOD STANDING, A PROFESSIONAL LICENSE OR CREDENTIAL
RECOGNIZED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDERSTAND THE REGULATIONS ADOPTED
UNDER THIS SECTION, INCLUDING REQUIREMENTS FOR ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE
PLANS AND ENGINEERING STUDIES;
2. PUBLISH A LIST OF ENERGY AUDITORS THAT HAVE
COMPLETED THE TRAINING OFFERED UNDER ITEM 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH; AND
3. INCLUDE A FEE TO COVER THE COST FOR THE
DEPARTMENT OR ITS CONTRACTOR TO PROVIDE THE TRAINING.
(II) AN OWNER OF A COVERED BUILDING SHALL CONTRACT
WITH AN ENERGY AUDITOR THAT COMPLETED THE TRAINING REQUIRED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH TO SUBMIT AN ENGINEERING PLAN OR

HOUSE BILL 49
STUDY SEEKING A WAIVER UNDER PARAGRAPHS (2)(IX) AND (X) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(8) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY CERTIFY A BUILDING ENERGY PERFORMANCE STANDARDS
PROGRAM ADOPTED BY A COUNTY AND WAIVE THE REQUIREMENT FOR A COVERED
BUILDING TO COMPLY WITH THE STATEWIDE PROGRAM ADOPTED UNDER THIS
SECTION WHEN:
1. THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES, BASED ON A
DEMONSTRATION PROVIDED BY THE COUNTY, THAT THE COUNTY HAS ADOPTED A
BUILDING ENERGY PERFORMANCE STANDARDS PROGRAM THAT IS AT LEAST AS
STRINGENT AS THE STATEWIDE PROGRAM ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
2. THE COUNTY ANNUALLY SUBMITS TO THE
DEPARTMENT A COMPLETE LIST OF COVERED BUILDINGS, INCLUDING THEIR
ENERGY USE INTENSITY, DIRECT GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS, AND COMPLIANCE
STATUS WITH THE COUNTY PROGRAM.
(II) A COUNTY ADMINISTERING A BUILDING ENERGY
PERFORMANCE STANDARDS PROGRAM CERTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY TAKE APPROPRIATE ACTIONS TO
ENFORCE THE STANDARDS, INCLUDING:
1. ESTABLISHING ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE
PATHWAYS FOR COMPLYING WITH ENERGY USE INTENSITY AND DIRECT
GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED IN THE STANDARDS;
2. IMPOSING AND COLLECTING ALTERNATIVE
COMPLIANCE FEES IN THE SAME AMOUNT AND MANNER ALLOWED BY THE
DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
3. IMPOSING AND COLLECTING PENALTIES IN THE SAME
AMOUNT AND MANNER ALLOWED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER § 2–610 OF THIS
TITLE.
(9) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL PRECLUDE A COUNTY FROM
ADOPTING BUILDING ENERGY PERFORMANCE STANDARDS FOR BUILDINGS THAT
ARE NOT COVERED BUILDINGS UNDER THE STATEWIDE PROGRAM ADOPTED UNDER
THIS SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 49 17
(10) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE THE NECESSARY APPLICATION
AND FORMS FOR A WAIVER UNDER THIS SECTION AVAILABLE ON THE
DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE.
(F) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY NOT:
(I) IMPOSE AND COLLECT ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE FEES
UNDER THIS SECTION UNTIL 2032; OR
(II) IMPOSE AND COLLECT PENALTIES FOR FAILURE TO
ACHIEVE BUILDING ENERGY PERFORMANCE STANDARDS UNDER THIS SECTION
UNTIL 2032.
(2) THE PROHIBITION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS
SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO THE IMPOSITION AND COLLECTION OF PENALTIES
FOR FAILURE TO MEET ANY REPORTING REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Economic Development
3–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Life sciences” includes the fields of biotechnology, pharmaceuticals,
biomedical technologies, life systems technologies, food sciences, environmental sciences,
and biomedical devices.
Article – Environment
2–1202.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(h) (1) “Manufacturing” means the process of substantially transforming, or a
substantial step in the process of substantially transforming, tangible personal property
into a new and different article of tangible personal property by the use of labor or
machinery.
(2) “Manufacturing”, when performed by companies primarily engaged in
the activities described in paragraph (1) of this subsection, includes:
(i) The operation of saw mills, grain mills, or feed mills;

HOUSE BILL 49
(ii) The operation of machinery and equipment used to extract and
process minerals, metals, or earthen materials or by–products that result from the
extracting or processing; and
(iii) Research and development activities.
(3) “Manufacturing” does not include:
(i) Activities that are primarily a service;
(ii) Activities that are intellectual, artistic, or clerical in nature;
(iii) Public utility services, including gas, electric, water, and steam
production services;
(iv) The production of cement; or
(v) Any other activity that would not commonly be considered as
manufacturing.
2–1601.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) (1) “Agricultural building” means a structure that is used primarily to
cultivate, manufacture, process, or produce agricultural crops, raw materials, products, or
commodities.
(2) “Agricultural building” includes a greenhouse.
(c) “Building” has the meaning stated in the International Building Code.
(d) “Commercial building” means a building that is subject to the commercial
provisions of the International Energy Conservation Code.
(e) (1) “Covered building” means a building that:
(i) 1. Is a commercial or multifamily residential building in the
State; or
2. Is owned by the State; and
(ii) Has a gross floor area of 35,000 square feet or more, excluding
the parking garage area.
(2) “Covered building” does not include:

HOUSE BILL 49 19
(i) A building designated as a historic property under federal, State,
or local law;
(ii) A public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school building;
(iii) A HOSPITAL;
(IV) A [manufacturing] building IN WHICH 50% OR MORE OF THE
BUILDING’S GROSS FLOOR AREA IS USED FOR MANUFACTURING, AS DEFINED IN §
2–1202 OF THIS ARTICLE; or
[(iv)] (V) An agricultural building.
(f) “CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 1–101 OF
THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE.
(G) “Direct greenhouse gas emissions” means greenhouse gas emissions produced
on–site by covered buildings.
[(g)] (H) “District energy” means thermal energy generated at one or more
central facilities that produce hot water, steam, or chilled water that then flows through a
network of insulated underground pipes to provide hot water, space heating, air
conditioning, or chilled water to nearby buildings.
(I) “ECONOMICALLY INFEASIBLE” MEANS:
(1) FOR A COVERED BUILDING THAT IS A MULTIFAMILY RESIDENTIAL
BUILDING, THE EXPECTED PAYBACK PERIOD FOR AN ENERGY OR EMISSIONS
REDUCTION MEASURE IS MORE THAN 10 YEARS, AS OF THE DATE OF SUBMITTAL OF
A WAIVER REQUEST TO THE DEPARTMENT UNDER § 2–1602(C)(2)(X) OF THIS
SUBTITLE, ACCOUNTING FOR ALL AVAILABLE INCENTIVES AND AVOIDED
ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE PATHWAY PAYMENTS; AND
(2) FOR A COVERED BUILDING THAT IS NOT A MULTIFAMILY
RESIDENTIAL BUILDING, THE EXPECTED PAYBACK PERIOD FOR AN ENERGY OR
EMISSIONS REDUCTION MEASURE IS MORE THAN 25 YEARS, AS OF THE DATE OF
SUBMITTAL OF A WAIVER REQUEST TO THE DEPARTMENT UNDER § 2–1602(C)(2)(X)
OF THIS SUBTITLE, ACCOUNTING FOR ALL AVAILABLE INCENTIVES AND AVOIDED
ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE PATHWAY PAYMENTS.
(J) “ENERGY OR EMISSIONS REDUCTION MEASURE” MEANS A PHYSICAL
CHANGE TO A BUILDING OR A CONNECTION TO A DISTRICT ENERGY SYSTEM THAT

HOUSE BILL 49
REDUCES THE BUILDING’S ENERGY USE OR GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS AT THE
LOWEST PRACTICABLE COST.
(K) “IMPRACTICABLE” INCLUDES THAT AN ENERGY OR EMISSIONS
REDUCTION MEASURE NECESSARY TO COMPLY WITH THIS SUBTITLE CANNOT BE
REASONABLY IMPLEMENTED, INCLUDING DUE TO LACK OF EXISTING TECHNOLOGY.
(L) “LIFE SCIENCES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–201 OF THE
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE.
Article – Public Utilities
1–101.
(a) In this division the following words have the meanings indicated.
(h–1) (1) “Critical infrastructure” means assets, systems, and networks, whether
physical or virtual, considered by the U.S. Department of Homeland Security to be so vital
to the United States that their incapacitation or destruction would have a debilitating effect
on one or more of the following:
(i) security;
(ii) national economic security;
(iii) national public health; or
(iv) safety.
(2) “Critical infrastructure” includes:
(i) a hospital or health care facility; and
(ii) a data center as defined in § 11–239 of the Tax – General Article.
Article – State Government
9–20B–05.
(a) There is a Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund.
(b) The purpose of the Fund is to implement the Strategic Energy Investment
Program.
(e) The Fund consists of:

HOUSE BILL 49 21
(1) all of the proceeds from the sale of allowances under § 2–1002(g) of the
Environment Article;
(2) money appropriated in the State budget to the Program;
(3) repayments and prepayments of principal and interest on loans made
from the Fund;
(4) interest and investment earnings on the Fund;
(5) compliance fees paid under § 7–705 of the Public Utilities Article;
(6) money received from any public or private source for the benefit of the
Fund;
(7) money transferred from the Public Service Commission under §
7–207.2(c)(3) of the Public Utilities Article; [and]
(8) money distributed under § 2–614.1 of the Tax – General Article; AND
(9) ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE FEES PAID PATHWAY PAYMENTS
UNDER § 2–1602(C)(2)(V) 2–1602(C)(2)(VII) OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(G–2) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
PROCEEDS RECEIVED BY THE FUND FROM ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE PATHWAY
PAYMENTS UNDER § 2–1602 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE SHALL BE USED TO
PROVIDE GRANTS AND LOANS TO HELP OWNERS OF COVERED BUILDINGS COMPLY
WITH REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER § 2–1602 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(2) UP TO 10% OF ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE PATHWAY PAYMENTS
UNDER § 2–1602 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE MAY BE USED FOR
ADMINISTRATION OF THE GRANTS AND LOANS DESCRIBED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect on the taking effect of the termination provision specified in Section 17 of Chapter 38
of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2022. If that termination provision takes effect,
Section 1 of this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect. This Act may not be interpreted to have any
effect on that termination provision.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to the provisions of
Section 4 of this Act, this Act shall take effect October 1, 2025.